North Carolina, session 2025, HB117.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 2(b) of S.L. 2021-46, as amended by S.L. 2022-38, reads as
rewritten:
"SECTION 2.(b) This section applies to the Towns of Holden Beach Beach, Ocean Isle
Beach, Topsail Beach, and Surf City only."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 25th day of June, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ John R. Bell, IV
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
*H117-v-5*